Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.050

Peddler's license—Liability of deposit—Lien on.

Each deposit made with the county shall be subject to all taxes legally chargeable thereto, to attachment and execution on behalf of the creditors of the licensee whose claims arise in connection with the business done under his or her license, and the county may be held to answer as trustee in any civil action in contract or tort brought against any licensee, and shall pay over, under order of the court or upon execution, such amount of money as the licensee may be chargeable with upon the final determination of the case. Such deposit shall also be subject to the payment of any and all fines and penalties incurred by the licensee through violations of the provisions of RCW 36.71.010, 36.71.020, 36.71.030, 36.71.040 and 36.71.060, which shall be a lien upon the deposit and shall be collected in the manner provided by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4123; 1985 c 91 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.050. Prior: 1909 c 214 s 6; RRS s 8358.]